California statutes. Water Code
Districts so contracting have full power to perform and observe the contracts in accordance with the tenor and spirit thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23463.

Contracts made pursuant to this article shall be liberally construed to effectuate them according to their true intent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23464.

The execution of a contract between districts may be authorized by resolution of their respective boards.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23465.

Any and all such contracts executed prior to September 13, 1941, by and between such districts and all acts of boards of directors and other officers of such districts leading up to and including the execution of such contract or contracts, are hereby legalized, ratified, confirmed and declared valid to all intents and purposes, and the power of such districts to execute, carry out, perform and observe such contracts and every provision thereof is hereby ratified, confirmed and declared valid and such contracts are hereby declared to be in all respects the legal and binding obligations of, against and in favor of each of such contracting districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 6.5. DISTRIBUTION DISTRICTS IN IRRIGATION DISTRICTS [23500. - 23583.]



  CHAPTER 1. Formation [23500. - 23535.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition for Formation [23500. - 23506.]

23500.

Contiguous land may be formed into a distribution district for the purpose of contracting with the United States, pursuant to the federal reclamation laws, for the construction of a distribution system separate from or supplemental to the works of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23501.

As used in this part, “federal reclamation law” shall mean the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902 (32 Stats. 388), and all acts amendatory thereof or supplemental thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23502.

The formation of a distribution district may be proposed and the petition therefor shall be signed by two-thirds or more in number of the holders of title to the land in the proposed distribution district appearing on the last equalized assessment roll of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23503.

A petition for the formation of a distribution district shall contain all of the following:

(a) Statement of the plans of the proposed distribution system.

(b) Description of the land in the proposed distribution district.

(c) Names of the owners of all land within the proposed distribution district with their last known addresses.

(d) Description of the land owned in the proposed distribution district by each owner, which shall be according to the next preceding equalized assessment book of the district.

(e) Signatures of the petitioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23504.

The petition, all proceedings in reference to it, the distribution district, and the land in it shall be designated by a number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23505.

The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments, which shall be duplicates except as to signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23506.

A petition to form a distribution district shall be filed with the secretary in the office of the district and may be inspected by all persons interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Plans and Estimate of Assessment [23510. - 23512.]

23510.

Upon receipt of a petition to form a distribution district the board shall cause a survey to be made of the proposed distribution system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23511.

If the survey shows that the distribution system is feasible, the board shall cause to be prepared the following:

(a) An estimate of the cost of the proposed distribution system.

(b) A statement of the estimated rate of ad valorem tax which probably will be necessary to meet the distribution district’s obligation to the United States under the proposed contract or contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23512.

The estimate of cost and the statement of the estimated rate of ad valorem tax shall be filed with the secretary in the office of the district and may be inspected by all persons interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hearing on Formation [23520. - 23524.]

23520.

After the filing of the formation petition and the estimate of cost and the statement of the estimated rate of ad valorem tax, the board shall give notice of a hearing on the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23521.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by all of the following:

(a) Posting a notice in three public places within the proposed distribution district.

(b) Publication of the notice once a week for two weeks in a newspaper published in the office county.

(c) Mailing a copy of the notice to the last known address of all of the owners of land in the proposed distribution district to the addresses appearing on the last equalized assessment roll of the district.

The notices shall be posted and mailed not less than twenty days prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23522.

At the hearing the board shall hear any objections coming before it to any of the following:

(a) The petition.

(b) The formation of the distribution district.

(c) The land to be included within the distribution district.

(d) The proposed distribution system.

(e) The estimate of cost.

(f) The estimate of the ad valorem tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23523.

At the hearing the board shall make any changes in reference to matters set forth in Section 23522 as it considers proper. The board may exclude any part of the land described in the petition from the proposed distribution district and may include additional land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23524.

If any additional land is included within the proposed irrigation district, the hearing shall be continued and the owners of the added land given personal notice of not less than twenty days of the addition of the land to the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Formation and Assessment [23530. - 23535.]

23530.

Regardless of any findings made by the board if more than one-third in number of the owners of title to land within a proposed distribution district object at the hearing to its formation or to the levy of the proposed ad valorem tax, the board shall deny the petition, and no further proceeding shall be had on it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23531.

If at the hearing the board finds that it would not be for the best interest of the district to form the distribution district the board shall order the proceedings dismissed without prejudice to their renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23532.

If the board finds that it would be for the best interests of the district and the proposed distribution district to form the distribution district, it shall make and enter in its minutes a final order:

(a) Approving the petition.

(b) Forming the distribution district.

(c) Providing that an ad valorem assessment shall be levied each year in the same manner as district assessments to meet the obligations of the contract with the United States under the federal reclamation laws.

(d) Describing the land in the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23533.

Assessments levied for the purpose of meeting obligations accruing under a contract with the United States pursuant to the reclamation laws shall be payable in the same manner and at the same time as district assessments, and such distribution district assessments shall be made in the number and amount sufficient to meet the obligations accruing under such contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23534.

The secretary shall cause a certified copy of the order creating the distribution district to be recorded in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any land of the distribution district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23535.

All lands of the distribution district shall remain jointly liable for all obligations accruing to the United States under any contract between the distribution district and the United States pursuant to the federal reclamation laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Inclusion and Exclusion of Land [23540. - 23549.]



  ARTICLE 1. Inclusion of Land [23540. - 23542.]

23540.

If at any time it is desired to include additional land in a distribution district, a petition for inclusion signed by the owners of the land to be included and by two-thirds in number of the holders of title to the land in the distribution district may be filed with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23541.

The inclusion petition shall describe the land in the distribution district as enlarged by the proposed inclusions and give the names and addresses of the owners of the additional land in substantially the same manner as in the original petition for forming a distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23542.

The same proceedings shall be had on the distribution district inclusion petition as upon the original petition for the formation of a distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exclusion of Land [23545. - 23549.]

23545.

At any time before a district has incurred any indebtedness or obligation, or after all indebtedness and obligations have been discharged, two-thirds or more in number of the holders of title to an area of land in the distribution district, as appears on the last equalized assessment roll, desiring to be excluded therefrom may by verified petition filed with the board of the district, request that the area be excluded from the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

23546.

The secretary of the district, upon the filing of the petition, shall examine it and if, in his opinion, the petition has been signed by the requisite number of landowners, he shall set it for hearing at the first regular meeting of the board of the district held after the expiration of 30 days after the filing of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

23547.

The secretary of the board shall cause notice of the time and place of hearing to be posted for a period of two weeks next preceding the hearing (a) in three public places in the area requested to be excluded, and (b) in three public places in the area of the distribution district which has not been requested to be excluded, and to be published once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which any portion of the distribution district is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

23548.

At the time and place of the hearing, anyone interested in the petition for exclusion may appear before the board of the district and urge or oppose its approval. After the hearing, if the board of the district determines that it is for the best interests of the distribution district that the land requested to be excluded, or any portion thereof, should be excluded, the board of the district shall make an order excluding the land, or portion thereof, and cause it to be recorded in the office of the county recorder of each county in which the excluded land is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

23549.

All expenses incurred in connection with a petition to exclude lands from a distribution district shall be paid by the petitioners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Functioning of Distribution Districts [23550. - 23571.]



  ARTICLE 1. Distribution District Management [23550. - 23553.]

23550.

In a district containing a distribution district the board and all of the officers of the district each respectively has all of the rights, powers, and privileges as to the distribution district, its land, and the proceedings in relation to the distribution district that each respectively has for the district of which the distribution district is a part, including the right of the district to acquire, own, hold, and dispose of property, and to contract in the name of the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23551.

The board may also hold or dispose of property used or acquired in connection with the distribution district in the name of the directors and their successors in office as trustees for the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23552.

The board of the district may in lieu in whole or in part of levying ad valorem assessments for repayment of construction costs under a contract with the United States pursuant to the federal reclamation laws, fix and collect charges for the use of water or for any other service furnished by means of the distribution system in the same manner and with the same effect as charges are made and collected by districts for the use of water or for services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23553.

The board of the district may provide for any maintenance and operation of the distribution system of a distribution district that may be required by the provisions of the contract between the distribution district and the United States under the federal reclamation laws, from funds of the irrigation district in lieu of levying further distribution district assessments for such purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Distribution District Warrants [23560. - 23560.]

23560.

A district may issue distribution district warrants signed by its president and secretary from receipts of distribution district assessments and charges in such amounts and to the United States or such persons as may be required to carry out the provisions of a contract between a distribution district and the United States, executed under the federal reclamation laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Actions and Proceedings [23570. - 23571.]

23570.

All acts, proceedings, conclusions, and findings of fact, including the levy of assessments or charges, by a board of a district concerning a distribution district therein shall be conclusive except in an action or proceeding instituted within six months after the acts, proceedings, conclusions, or findings were had or made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23571.

An action to determine the validity of an assessment may be brought pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 860) of Title 10 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1540.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Dissolution of Distribution Districts [23580. - 23583.]

23580.

At any time prior to incurring any indebtedness or obligation, or upon the full payment of all indebtedness or obligations of a distribution district a petition, signed and acknowledged by not less than the number of owners of land constituting the distribution district required to sign a petition to form the distribution district, may be filed with the board requesting that the distribution district be dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23581.

A hearing on dissolution shall be had in the same manner and after the same notice as is required for the formation of a distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23582.

The board may, after the hearing, order the distribution district dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

23583.

The order of dissolution shall be recorded in the same manner as the order forming the distribution district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 169.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS IN IRRIGATION DISTRICTS [23600. - 24103.]



  CHAPTER 1. Formation [23600. - 23674.]



  ARTICLE 1. Petition for Formation [23600. - 23608.]

23600.

Land which need not be contiguous may be formed into an improvement district for one or more of the following:

(a) Irrigation or domestic water service by a system of pumps or conduits or both.

(b) Drainage or flood control.

(c) Acquisition of existing works incidental to a water distribution system separate from or supplemental to the works of the district.

(d) Change or improvement of the water distribution system of the district.

(e) Maintenance of irrigation works of the district and works for water supply or drainage or both in or for the improvement district.

(f) Control of weeds in or along conduits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

23601.

As used in connection with improvement districts:

(a) “Improvement” includes acquisition of existing works, construction of new works, and change of existing works and excludes operation, maintenance, and weed control.

(b) “Construction” includes change of existing works.

(c) Both “operation” and “maintenance” include weed control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23602.

The formation of an improvement district may be proposed and the petition therefor shall be signed by two-thirds or more in number of the holders of title to the land in the proposed improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23603.

A petition for the formation of an improvement district shall contain all of the following:

(a) Statement of the plans of the proposed improvement.

(b) Description of the land in the proposed improvement district.

(c) Names of the owners of all land within the proposed improvement district with their last known addresses.

(d) Description of the land owned in the proposed improvement district by each owner, which shall be according to the next preceding equalized assessment book of the district. District owned land in the proposed improvement district shall be described whether or not it appears on the next preceding assessment book of the district.

(e) Signatures of the petitioners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

23604.

The petition, all proceedings in reference to it, the improvement district, and the land in it shall be designated by a number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23605.

The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments, which shall be duplicates except as to signatures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23606.

A petition to form an improvement district shall be filed with the secretary in the office of the district and may be inspected by all persons interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23607.

Notwithstanding Section 23602, or any other provision of law to the contrary, in the Palmdale Irrigation District the formation of an improvement district may be proposed by the board of the district. In such event no petition shall be required for the formation of the improvement district, but the board shall give notice of and hold a hearing on the proposal as nearly as practicable in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. If the board finds that it would be for the best interests of the district and the proposed improvement district to form the improvement district, it shall proceed with the formation of the improvement district as nearly as practicable in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, except that it shall not enter a final order forming the improvement district unless the formation of the improvement district as proposed by the board is approved by the voters of the proposed improvement district at an election held within the proposed improvement district at which a majority of the voters voting on the proposition approve the formation of the improvement district as proposed by the board. Such election may be consolidated with any other election held within the district.

At the time of the hearing on the proposed improvement district, the board of directors may also determine that it is in the best interests of the district and of the improvement district that bonds be sold to finance the acquisition of any existing improvements within the improvement district and the construction of other improvements therein. An election shall then be called to submit to the voters the proposal of whether or not bonds in the amount determined by the board should be authorized, and the election shall be called and held pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 21925) of Part 4 of this division. In that event the bond election shall be consolidated with the election for the formation of the improvement district and the improvement district shall not be formed unless two-thirds of the votes cast are in favor of both the formation of the district and the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 554.)
-------------------------------------------

23608.

Notwithstanding Section 23602, or any other provision of law to the contrary, in the Littlerock Creek Irrigation District the formation of an improvement district may be proposed by the board of the district. In such event no petition shall be required for the formation of the improvement district, but the board shall give notice of and hold a hearing on the proposal as nearly as practicable in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. If the board finds that it would be for the best interests of the district and the proposed improvement district to form the improvement district, it shall proceed with the formation of the improvement district as nearly as practicable in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, except that it shall not enter a final order forming the improvement district unless the formation of the improvement district as proposed by the board is approved by the voters of the proposed improvement district at an election held within the proposed improvement district at which a majority of the voters voting on the proposition approve the formation of the improvement district as proposed by the board. Such election may be consolidated with any other election held within the district.

At the time of the hearing on the proposed improvement district, the board of directors may also determine that it is in the best interests of the district and of the improvement district that bonds be sold to finance the acquisition of any existing improvements within the improvement district and the construction of other improvements therein. An election shall then be called to submit to the voters the proposal of whether or not bonds in the amount determined by the board should be authorized, and the election shall be called and held pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 21925) of Part 4 of this division. In that event the bond election shall be consolidated with the election for the formation of the improvement district and the improvement district shall not be formed unless two-thirds of the votes cast are in favor of both the formation of the district and the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 144.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Plans and Estimate of Assessment [23625. - 23627.]

23625.

Upon receipt of a petition to form an improvement district the board shall cause a survey to be made of the proposed improvements, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23626.

If the survey shows that the improvements are feasible, the board shall cause to be prepared the following:

(a) Plans and specifications of the improvements proposed to be constructed when the petition proposes the construction of improvements.

(b) An estimate of the cost of the proposed improvements which may include an amount not in excess of 10 percent of the aggregate cost of the proposed improvements to create a reserve fund to be used and applied as additional security for the payment of principal of and interest on any warrants of the improvement district issued against assessments levied for the payment of the cost of the proposed improvement.

(c) Statement of the proposed assessment for the cost of the proposed improvements apportioned to each tract of land in the proposed improvement district as the tracts appear on the last equalized district assessment book and to district-owned land in the proposed improvement district whether or not it appears on the last equalized district assessment book, which apportionment shall be according to the benefits that will accrue to each tract by virtue of the proposed improvements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

23627.

If there are any, the plans and specifications, estimate of cost, and the statement of the proposed assessment shall be filed with the secretary in the office of the district and may be inspected by all persons interested.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hearing on Formation [23645. - 23651.]

23645.

After the filing of the formation petition, and if any, the plans and specifications, the estimate of cost, and statement of the proposed assessment, the board shall give notice of a hearing upon the petition, and if a special assessment is to be levied in the improvement district pursuant to Article 4 of this chapter, the notice shall also state that the hearing is called to determine whether or not the special assessment should be levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23646.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by all of the following:

(a) Posting a notice in three public places within the proposed improvement district.

(b) Publication of the notice once a week for two weeks in a newspaper published in the office county.

(c) Mailing a copy of the notice to the last known address of all of the owners of land in the proposed improvement district to the addresses appearing in the petition.

The notices shall be posted and mailed not less than 20 days prior to the date set for the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23647.

At the hearing the board shall hear any objections coming before it to any of the following:

(a) The petition.

(b) The formation of the improvement district.

(c) The land to be included within the improvement district.

(d) The plans and specifications.

(e) The estimate of cost.

(f) The proposed assessment.

(g) The apportionment of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23648.

At the hearing the board shall make any changes in reference to the matters set forth in Section 23647 as it considers proper. The board may exclude any part of the land described in the petition from the proposed improvement district and may include additional land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23649.

If any additional land is included in the proposed improvement district, the hearing shall be continued and the owners of the added land given personal notice of not less than 20 days of the addition of the land to the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23650.

Any of the following conditions specified in the plans and specifications of any improvement district heretofore or hereafter formed imposed upon the respective parcels of land in the improvement district are binding and may be enforced:

(a) Limitations, based on the amount of assessment in the respective parcels or otherwise on:

(1) Number of outlets;

(2) Number of services;

(3) Number of connections with the improvement district pipe line;

(4) Uses to which water may be put;

(5) Quantity of water that may be used.

(b) Increases provided for as to any of the foregoing on condition that specified tolls, connection charges, or additional assessments are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 718.)
-------------------------------------------

23651.

All such tolls, connection charges, and additional assessments shall be held and applied upon and reduce the last call or calls of the improvement district assessment, or held, and used, or distributed as provided for in Section 24529.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 718.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Formation and Assessment [23665. - 23674.]

23665.

Regardless of any findings made by the board if more than one-third in number of the holders of title to land within a proposed improvement district object at the hearing to its formation or the levy of the proposed assessment, the board shall deny the petition, and no further proceeding shall be had on it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23666.

If at the hearing the board finds that it would not be for the best interests of the district and the proposed improvement district to form the improvement district the board shall order the proceedings dismissed without prejudice to their renewal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23667.

If the board finds that it would be for the best interests of the district and the proposed improvement district to form the improvement district, it shall make and enter in its minutes a final order:

(a) Approving the petition.

(b) Forming the improvement district.

(c) Levying the assessment if any is provided for and if the assessment is necessary.

(d) Apportioning the assessment, if levied, to the land in the improvement district according to benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23668.

The order shall contain a description of the land in the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23669.

Any assessment levied pursuant to Section 23667 shall include both of the following sums:

(a) An amount equal to interest on any deferred payments at a rate not exceeding 12 percent each year.

(b) An amount equal to 10 percent more than all other sums to be raised by the assessment, in order to provide for anticipated delinquencies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 740, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

23670.

Except as provided in Section 23670.1, the assessment may be made payable in not more than 10 annual installments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1189.)
-------------------------------------------

23670.1.

Upon approval by two-thirds of the board, the assessment may be made payable in not more than 20 annual installments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1226, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

23671.

The secretary shall cause a certified copy of the order creating the improvement district to be recorded in the office of the county recorder in each county in which any land of the improvement district is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23672.

The assessment and each installment of it shall be and remain a lien on the land in the improvement district in the same manner as and be a part of the annual assessment of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23673.

Upon a change or resubdivision upon the assessment book of the district of any parcel of land in an improvement district, the board upon its own initiative or upon a petition of the owner of the parcel so changed or resubdivided, may reapportion the improvement district assessment upon the parcel, and the order of reapportionment shall be recorded in the same manner as the order levying the original assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

23674.

If the actual cost of the improvements is substantially less than the estimated cost the assessment may be reduced proportionately on each parcel by recomputing it based on actual costs with the percentage and interest provided for in Section 23669 added thereto. The reapportionment or a statement that the assessment on each parcel has been reduced by a designated percentage shall be recorded in the same manner as the order levying the original assessment.

Installments of assessments levied on district owned land becoming due while the land is still owned by the district shall be paid by the district. Conveyance of such lands into private ownership shall not release the lien thereon of the assessment and the unpaid installments of it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 816.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Alternative Procedure for Formation [23750. - 23776.]



  ARTICLE 1. Proposal by Board [23750. - 23753.]

23750.

This chapter provides an alternative procedure for forming an improvement district within a district for the purpose of the construction of improvements in it, or the acquisition, installation, replacement, or extension of existing works for the production and distribution of water, or any number of these if the cost thereof will not exceed the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) and the area of the land to be included in the improvement district does not exceed 1,000 acres.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

23751.

Unless otherwise expressly provided the formation proceedings provided by this chapter shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of the next preceding chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23752.

No petition is required for the formation of an improvement district pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23753.

The board may by resolution cause a survey of the proposed improvement to be made, which survey shall include each of the following:

(a) Detailed plans and specifications.

(b) An estimate of the total cost of the improvement.

(c) A description of the land to be benefited.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Hearing and Formation [23770. - 23776.]

23770.

If the cost of the improvements does not require a special assessment in excess of a total of fifty dollars ($50) per acre over an area to be improved not in excess of 1,000 acres, the board may by resolution set a time for a hearing on whether or not to form the improvement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

23771.

The board shall give notice of the time and place of the formation hearing in the same manner as provided for the giving of notice for the hearing of a formation petition pursuant to Chapter 1 of this part except that the notice to be mailed to the property owners shall be addressed to their last known address as shown on the assessment book or other records of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23772.

Owners of the property proposed to be included within the improvement district may be heard either in opposition to or in support of the formation of the improvement district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23773.

Proceedings at the hearing shall be the same as provided for at a hearing upon the formation petition pursuant to Chapter 1 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23774.

Upon the conclusion of the hearing to form an improvement district an order shall be made by the board either dismissing the proceedings or ordering the improvement to proceed in the same manner and with the same effect as provided in Article 4 of Chapter 1 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23775.

If a formation order is made pursuant to this chapter, the land formed into the improvement district shall, for a period not to exceed five years, be assessed in an amount not to exceed ten dollars ($10) per acre per year in addition to the regular assessments levied on the same land annually for district purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------

23776.

Assessments in an improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter shall be levied, collected, and enforced at the same time and in the same manner as annual assessments for district purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 372.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2A. Revenue Improvement Districts [23800. - 23811.]

23800.

As used in this chapter and in other chapters when applied to an improvement district or proposed improvement district formed or to be formed under this chapter,

(a) “Land” means land entitled to receive water from a district as a matter of right but located outside the district, and land in the district, or either of these.

(b) “Revenue” means all or any part of any source or sources of payment excluding assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 717.)
-------------------------------------------

23801.

Unless otherwise expressly provided in this chapter the provisions of all sections of Part 7 of this division shall be applicable to an improvement district formed pursuant to this chapter.
